src/fst/incoming/kawe-verb-pref.lexc
!! Verbal prefixes

LEXICON VerbPrefixes

TemporalPrefix  ;

LEXICON TemporalPrefix

FuturePrefix    ;
PastPrefix      ;
CondPrefix  ;

LEXICON FuturePrefix 
<0:futPref "@U.Aspect.Punct@">   Future;

LEXICON Future
Fut+:en PronomPrefix;


LEXICON CondPrefix
<0:condPref "@U.Aspect.Punct@">   Conditional;

LEXICON Conditional
Cond+:ae    PronomPrefix;


LEXICON PastPrefix
<0:pastPref "@U.Aspect.Punct@">   DefinitePast;

LEXICON DefinitePast
DefPast+:wa%'    PronomPrefix;
